Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 21. Commissioners in Other States and Foreign Countries

§ 851.
Appointment and powers of commissioners.

The Governor may appoint commissioners in other states and in foreign countries who shall hold office for five years unless sooner removed by him or her. They may take depositions, affidavits, and testimony to be used in any proceedings in Superior Court, administer oaths and take the acknowledgment of deeds and other instruments to be used or recorded in this State, and their acts in other states or foreign countries shall have the same force as though performed by a justice or master in this State.

HISTORY:

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 852.
Oath and bond.

Before entering upon his or her duties, each commissioner shall take and subscribe an oath of office before a magistrate of his or her locality and execute a bond to this State with sureties to the satisfaction of the Governor in the sum of $500.00, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties.
The bond shall be kept in the office of the Secretary of State, and an action may be maintained against any or all signers thereof, in the name of the State, for the benefit of a person injured by the act or neglect of the commissioner.